Utah statutes.
16-16-820.   Other considerations of directors.
Unless the articles of organization otherwise provide, in considering the best
interests of a limited cooperative association, a director of the association
in discharging the duties of director, in conjunction with considering the
long and short term interest of the association and its patron members, may
consider:
(1)  the interest of employees, customers, and suppliers of the association;
(2)  the interest of the community in which the association operates; and
(3)  other cooperative principles and values that may be applied in the
context of the decision.
